Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.070

Administration of chapter—Rules—Investigations—Inspections.

(1) The director shall administer the provisions of this chapter and shall issue from time to time reasonable rules and regulations for enforcing and carrying out the provisions and purposes of this chapter.

(2) The director shall have supervisory and investigative authority over all employment agencies. Upon receiving a complaint against any employment agency, the director shall have the right to examine all books, documents, or records in its possession. In addition, the director may examine the office or offices where business is or shall be conducted by such agency.

[ 2002 c 86 s 269; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.